North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
“Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, the sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) in recurring funds for the 2018-2019 fiscal year shall be allocated as a grant to the North Carolina Association of People Supporting Employment First (NC APSE) to develop and implement training programs for the Department, including online training modules, on the provision of evidence-based supported employment services for individuals in targeted populations, in order to assist these individuals with preparation for, identification of, and maintenance of integrated, paid, competitive employment. The Department shall make these training programs available throughout the State to (i) employers that have hired or are willing to hire individuals in targeted populations, (ii) service providers of local management entities/managed care organizations, and (iii) any other entity the Department determines will benefit from receiving this training in order to achieve improved employment outcomes for individuals in targeted populations. As used in this section, ‘individuals in targeted populations’ means individuals with serious mental illness who are in or at risk of entry to an adult care home and individuals with intellectual disabilities, developmental disabilities, or both.”